Arkansas, session 2025, SB515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-16-124, concerning the requirement that a
unit of Arkansas history be taught at each elementary grade level in each
elementary school and for one full semester in every secondary school, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the division, in
consultation with veterans' organizations, shall develop and implement a unit
within existing Arkansas history course content guidelines under this section
that is dedicated to veterans and their families.
(2) The unit required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall include without limitation:
(A) The history of Arkansas veterans who served in various
national and international military conflicts;
*TNL209*
03-20-2025 15:44:37 TNL209

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB515
(B) The contributions and sacrifices of Arkansas veterans
and their families;
(C) Personal accounts from Arkansas veterans and their
families that discuss the social, emotional, and economic impact that serving
the United States has on Arkansas veterans and their families; and
(D) The challenges faced by Arkansas veterans and their
families upon a veteran's return to civilian life.

/s/J. Petty



























03-20-2025 15:44:37 TNL209